District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2205.02

Evidence of intoxication.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 2, 29 DCR 3138
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-714, §§ 4, 5, 29 DCR 5753
May 5, 1992, D.C. Law 9-96, § 2(a), 38 DCR 7274
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 33, 40 DCR 6311
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-212, § 5, 46 DCR 5
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-195, § 2, 53 DCR 8675
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 229, 56 DCR 7413
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(2)(A), 59 DCR 12957
Implied consent of motor vehicle operators to blood-alcohol content tests, see § 50-1901 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 40-717.1.
D.C. Law 16-195 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 18-88, in par. (1), substituted “less than 0.05 grams” for “0.05 grams or less”; and rewrote par. (2).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-198, October 21, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 8988).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-50, February 9, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 1458).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of expiration date of section, see § 4 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-382, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6697).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-437, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8737).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-194, November 3, 2005, 52 DCR 10034).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-300, February 27, 2006, 53 DCR 1881).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-469, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-518, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9104).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-6, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1452).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 229 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 229 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 103(e)(2)(A) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 2 and 3 (§§ 50-2205.02 and 50-2205.03), as Part A of this subchapter, entitled “Impaired Operating or Driving,” see § 103(a) and (e)(1) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 4 to 11 as Title II of the act, see § 103(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 12 and 13 as Title III of the act, see § 103(c) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, § 14 as Title IV of the act, see § 103(d) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 103(e)(2)(A) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 103(e)(2)(A) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 2 and 3 (§§ 50-2205.02 and 50-2205.03), as Subtitle A of Title I of the act, see § 103(a) and (e)(1) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 4 to 11 as Title II of the act, see § 103(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 12 and 13 as Title III of the act, see § 103(c) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For temporary (90 days) codification of D.C. Law 4-145, § 14 as Title IV of the act, see § 103(d) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 103(e)(2)(A) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Expiration of Law 12-212

Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 12-212, which provided that the act shall expire on September 30, 2000, was repealed by section 4 of D.C. Law 13-238.

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 12 of D.C. Law 4-145 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.